Utah statutes.
78B-6-608.   Action for damages because of usurpation -- Limitation of action.

A person may, at any time within one year after the date of an order for removal, bring an action against the party removed under the provisions of Section 78B-6-606 or 78B-6-607 and recover the damages sustained by the usurpation.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

